Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 7. Intrastate Gas Pipelines.

§ 77-11-301.
Legislative findings.

The Legislature of the State of Mississippi hereby finds that the public interest will be served by fostering the construction and operation of intrastate gas pipelines in order to secure for public and private needs a dependable supply of gas which will be produced within this state. The Legislature further finds that an emergency exists because numerous commercial enterprises have been closed or restricted in operation due to a shortage of gas resulting in a loss of employment and industrial capacity within this state and threatens irreparable injury to life or property, and the possibility exists that supplies of gas for residential and health related purposes may be restricted in the future. In order to assist in alleviating these shortages, both actual and potential, the Legislature enacts this legislation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 455, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1977).

§ 77-11-303.
Application of article.

The provisions of this article shall be applicable to all intrastate gas pipelines and related facilities, which would otherwise be a public utility as defined in Section 77-3-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the transmission, sale, sale for resale, and distribution of natural or artificial or mixed gas used within this state for consumption by industrial users or to a public utility or a public utility owned or operated by any municipality. The provisions of this article shall also be applicable in the manner set forth herein to the gas flowing through such pipelines.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 455, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1977).

§ 77-11-305.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this article, the following words shall have the meaning ascribed herein unless the context shall otherwise require:

“Corporation” shall mean a private or public corporation, municipality, association, a joint stock association or a business trust.

“Person” shall include a natural person, a partnership of two (2) or more persons having a joint or common interest, a cooperative, non-profit, limited dividend, or mutual association, a corporation or any other legal entity.

“Municipality” shall mean any incorporated city or town or village.

“Intrastate gas pipeline” shall mean the entire pipeline system owned by an entity carrying gas produced wholly within this state, which is not a field gathering system, including the primary gas pipeline and all lateral supply lines and related facilities extending therefrom to the point of sale to any industrial users, a public utility, or a public utility owned or operated by a municipality.

“Public utility” as used in this article shall mean any entity as defined by Section 77-3-3(d)(ii), Mississippi Code of 1972.

“Commission” shall mean the Mississippi Public Service Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 455, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1977).

§ 77-11-307.
Exemption from requirements imposed on public utilities.

No person who shall construct, acquire, extend or operate an intrastate gas pipeline for transmitting natural, manufactured or mixed gas for sale, sale for resale, or distribution for consumption by industrial users, public utilities, or a public utility owned or operated by a municipality, shall be deemed a public utility or be required to obtain a gas certificate or public convenience and necessity from the commission to engage in the foregoing activities.

Any person engaged in the transmission, sale, sale for resale, or distribution of natural, artificial, or mixed natural and artificial gas to industrial users, public utilities, or public utilities owned or operated by municipalities, by means of transportation, transmission or distribution in an intrastate gas pipeline shall not be deemed a public utility or be required to obtain a gas certificate of public convenience and necessity from the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 455, § 4(1, 2), eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1977).

§ 77-11-309.
Restriction on transmission, sale or distribution to industrial user serviced by gas public utility.

There shall be no transmission, sale, sale for resale, or distribution of natural, artificial, or mixed gas by an intrastate pipeline to an industrial user being served by a gas public utility holding a gas certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the commission or to an industrial user to be located within such certificated area unless the gas public utility holding such certificate of public convenience and necessity shall have filed with the commission a statement that it is either unwilling or unable to serve said user. Provided, however, that nothing contained in this article shall prevent the sale or transmission of natural gas to an industrial user by the producer of such gas or the sale of natural gas in or within the vicinity of the field where the gas is produced.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 455, § 4(3), eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1977).

§ 77-11-311.
Jurisdiction to enforce pipeline safety standards; natural gas or electric power public utility not exempt from regulation.

The commission shall have jurisdiction over an intrastate gas pipeline for the enforcement of natural gas pipeline safety standards, provided that nothing in this article shall be construed to exempt any natural gas or electric power public utility from regulation by the Public Service Commission as set out in Section 77-3-35, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 455, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1977).